Utah statutes.
7-1-304.   Civil actions against unauthorized operations.

The commissioner may bring any appropriate civil action to prevent or restrain any person from engaging in this state in any business subject to the jurisdiction of the department without first having obtained the authority to do so as provided in this title or from violating any other provisions of this title or any rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner.

